BrailleTables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2008 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

#Unified English Grade 2 Braille Contraction Table
#By Michael Curran <mick@kulgan.net>

#This is by no means complete, but at least all the important ascii symbols and general grade 2 contractions are here.
#I am trying to compress space as much as possible so a lot of syllable boundary rules havn't been included.

#Special braille signs
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
letsign 56
numsign 3456
midnum . 256

#Largest contractions
word a =
word about 1-12
contraction ab
word above 1-12-1236
contraction abv
sufword according 1-14
contraction ac
word across 1-14-1235
contraction acr
word after 1-124
contraction af
sufword afterward 1-124-2456
contraction afw
sufword afternoon 1-124-1345
contraction afn
word again 1-1245
contraction ag
word against 1-1245-34
contraction agst
word almost 1-123-134
contraction alm
word already 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word also 1-123
contraction al
word although 1-123-1456
word alth =
word altogether 1-123-2345-1245
contraction altg
word always 1-123-2456
contraction alw
word as 1356
contraction as
word be 23
contraction be
word because 23-14
word bec =
word before 23-124
word bef =
word behind 23-125
word beh =
word below 23-123
word bel =
word beneath 23-1345
sufword beside 23-234
sufword bes =
sufword between 23-2345
sufword bet =
word beyond 23-13456
word bey =
sufword blind 12-123
contraction bl
sufword braille 12-1235-123
contraction brl
word but 12
contraction b
word can 14
contraction c
sufword conceive 25-14-1236
contraction rcv
word could 14-145
contraction cd
word cannot 456-14
sufword character 5-16
word children 16-1345
word chn =
always deceive 145-14-1236
contraction dcv
word declare 145-14-123
contraction dcl
word do 145
contraction d
word either 15-24
contraction ei
lowword enough 26
contraction en
word every 15
contraction e
always father 5-124
always first 124-34
always fst =
word from 124
contraction f
always friend 124-1235
contraction fr
word go 1245
contraction g
always good 1245-145
contraction gd
word great 1245-1235-2345
contraction grt
word had 456-125
word have 125
contraction h
always here 5-125
word herself 125-12456-124
contraction herf
word him 125-134
contraction hm
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
lowword his 236
word i =
sufword immediate 24-134-134
contraction imm
word it 1346
contraction x
word its 1346-234
contraction xs
word itself 1346-124
contraction xf
word just 245
contraction j
word knowledge 13
contraction k
always know 5-13
sufword letter 123-1235
contraction lr
word like 123
contraction l
word little 123-123
contraction ll
sufword lord 5-123
word more 134
contraction m
sufword mother 5-134
sufword much 134-16
contraction mch
word must 134-34
contraction mst
word myself 134-13456-124
contraction myf
sufword name 5-1345
sufword necessary 1345-15-14
contraction nec
word neither 1345-15-24
contraction nei
word not 1345
contraction n
word ourselves 1256-1235-1236-234
contraction ourvs
word paid 1234-145
contraction pd
word people 1234
contraction p
word perhaps 1234-12456-125
contraction perh
sufword quick 12345-13
contraction qk
word quite 12345
contraction q
always question 5-12345
word rather 1235
contraction r
always receive 1235-14-1236
contraction rcv
always rejoice 1235-245-14
contraction rjc
word so 234
contraction s
word said 234-145
contraction sd
word shall 146
contraction sh
always should 146-145
contraction shd
word so 234
contraction s
always some 5-234
always spirit 456-234
word still 34
contraction st
word such 234-16
contraction sch
word that 2345
contraction t
word this 1456
contraction th
word thyself 1456-13456-124
contraction thyf
word today 2345-145
contraction td
word tomorrow 2345-134
contraction tm
word tonight 2345-1345
contraction tn
word themselves 2346-134-1236-234
contraction themvs
always their 456-2346
always there 5-2346
sufword time 5-2345
word these 45-2346
always through 5-1456
always together 2345-1245-1235
contraction tgr
word those 45-1456
word upon 45-136
word us 136
contraction u
always under 5-136
word very 1236
contraction v
lowword was 356
word which 156
contraction wh
word will 2456
contraction w
lowword were 2356
always where 5-156
always with 23456
always word 45-2456
word whose 45-156
always work 5-2456
always would 2456-145
contraction wd
always world 456-2456
word you 13456
contraction y
always young 5-13456
word your 13456-1235
contraction yr
word yours 13456-1235-234
contraction yrs
word yourself 13456-1235-124
contraction yrf
word yourselves 13456-1235-1236-234
contraction yrvs

#Smaller contractions
midendword ally 6-13456
midendword ance 46-15
always ever 5-15
always for 123456
midendword ful 56-123
midendword ing 346
midendword ity 56-13456
midendword less 46-234
always many 456-134
midendword ment 56-2345
midendword iness 24-56-234
midendword ness 56-234
midendword ong 56-1245
midendword  ound 46-145
midendword ount 46-2345
always ought 5-1256
always part 5-1234
always right 5-1235
midendword sion 46-1345
always the 2346
midendword tion 56-1345

#Smallist contractions
always and 12346
always ar 345
always ch 16
midword ea 2
always ed 1246
always en 26
always er 12456
midword gg 2356
always gh 126
always in 35
always of 12356
always one 5-135
always ou 1256
always ow 246
always sh 146
always st 34
always th 1456
always wh 156

#single symbols
always \x20 0  
repeatable \s\s 0-0
always 1 1
always 2 12
always 3 14
always 4 145
always 5 15
always 6 124
always 7 1245
always 8 125
always 9 24
always 0 245
always a 1
always A 1
always b 12
always B 12
always c 14
always C 14
always d 145
always D 145
always e 15
always E 15
always f 124
always F 124
always g 1245
always G 1245
always h 125
always H 125
always i 24
always I 24
always j 245
always J 245
always k 13
always K 13
always l 123
always L 123
always m 134
always M 134
always n 1345
always N 1345
always o 135
always O 135
always p 1234
always P 1234
always q 12345
always Q 12345
always r 1235
always R 1235
always s 234
always S 234
always t 2345
always T 2345
always u 136
always U 136
always v 1236
always V 1236
always w 2456
always W 2456
always x 1346
always X 1346
always y 13456
always Y 13456
always z 1356
always Z 1356
always " 6-2356
always ' 3
always / 456-34
always & 4-12346
always * 5-35
always { 456-126
always } 456-345
always ( 5-126
always ) 5-345
always [ 46-126
always ] 46-345
always , 2
always ; 23
always : 25
always . 256
always ! 235
always ? 236
always <= 456-4-126
always >= 456-4-345
always + 5-235
always < 4-126
always > 4-345
always = 5-2356
always % 46-356
always | 456-1256
always ^ 4-26
always ~ 4-35
always @ 4-1
always \\ 456-16
always # 456-1456
always - 36
always _ 46-36
always ` 46-16
always \t 456-2345
always $ 4-234

# other special characters
always © 2356-6-14-2356 copyright
always ¶ 4-1234-345 paragraph
always § 4-234-3 section
always ° 45-46-16 degrees
always ¢ 4-14 cents
always £ 4-123 pounds
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu
